Massachusetts, session 194th, S2750.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3 of Chapter 32 of the Massachusetts General Laws is hereby
amended by inserting the following language at the end of last sentence of subdivision (2),
paragraph (g), Group 2; "and in the City of Boston, all dispatchers, dispatch supervisors, and,
call takers who are full-time and who are certified by the state 911 Department as Certified
Telecommunicators as defined in 560 CMR 5.04"
SECTION 2. The provisions of this act are severable and if any provision, or portion
thereof, should be held to be unconstitutional or otherwise invalid by any court of competent
jurisdiction, such unconstitutionality or invalidity shall not affect the remaining provisions,
which remain in full force and effect.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1